Utah statutes.
53A-1-601.   Legislative intent.

(1)  It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this part to determine the effectiveness of school districts and schools in assisting students to master the fundamental educational skills towards which instruction is directed.

(2) (a)  The Utah Performance Assessment System for Students enacted under this part shall provide the public, the Legislature, the State Board of Education, school districts, public schools, and school teachers evaluative information regarding the various levels of proficiency achieved by students, so that they may have an additional tool to plan, measure, and evaluate the effectiveness of programs in the public schools.

(b)  The information may also be used to recognize excellence and to identify the need for additional resources or to reallocate educational resources in a manner to assure educational opportunities for all students and to improve existing programs.



Amended by Chapter 219, 2000 General Session

